Utah statutes.
17-41-201.   Agriculture protection area or industrial protection area
advisory board.
(1) (a) (i)  Each county legislative body shall appoint no more than five
members from the county's conservation district board of supervisors to serve
as the Agriculture Protection Area Advisory Board.
(ii)  Each county legislative body shall appoint an industrial protection area
advisory board.
(b)  A county legislative body may appoint the advisory board before or after
a proposal to create an agriculture protection area or industrial protection
area is filed.
(2)  Each member of an advisory board shall serve without salary, but a county
legislative body may reimburse members for expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties.
(3)  Each advisory board shall:
(a)  evaluate proposals for the establishment of agriculture protection areas
or industrial protection areas and make recommendations to the applicable
legislative body about whether or not the proposal should be accepted;
(b)  provide expert advice to the planning commission and to the applicable
legislative body about:
(i)  the desirability of the proposal;
(ii)  the nature of agricultural production or industrial use, as the case may
be, within the proposed area;
(iii)  the relation of agricultural production or industrial use, as the case
may be, in the area to the county as a whole; and
(iv)  which agriculture production or industrial use should be allowed within
the agriculture protection area or industrial protection area, respectively;
and
(c)  perform all other duties required by this chapter.
